Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2215.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Laws 2021, First Special Session chapter 7, article 13, section 75, subdivision 4, as amended by Laws 2024, chapter 108, article 1, section 28, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Required report. Prior to seeking federal approval for any aspect of waiver reimagine phase II and new text begin no later than December 15, 2026, new text end in collaboration with the Waiver Reimagine Advisory Committee, the commissioner must submit to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees and divisions with jurisdiction over health and human services a report on plans for waiver reimagine phase IInew text begin , as well as the actual Waiver Reimagine plan intended to be submitted for federal approvalnew text end . The report must also include any plans to adjust or modify the streamlined menu of services, the existing rate new text begin or budget new text end exemption criteria or process, the proposed individual budget deleted text begin rangesdeleted text end new text begin based on need and not location of services, including additional budget resources beyond the resources required to meet assessed need that may be necessary for the individual to live in the least restrictive environmentnew text end , and the role of MnCHOICES 2.0 assessment tool in determining service needs and individual deleted text begin budget rangesdeleted text end new text begin budgetsnew text end . Sec. 2. Laws 2021, First Special Session chapter 7, article 13, section 75, subdivision 5, as amended by Laws 2024, chapter 108, article 1, section 28, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Transition process. (a) Prior to implementation of wavier reimagine phase II, the commissioner must establish a process to assist people who use waiver services and lead agencies new text begin to new text end transition to a two-waiver system with an individual budget methodology. (b) The commissioner must ensure that the new waiver service menu and individual budgets allow people to live in their own home, family home, or any home and community-based setting of their choicenew text begin , including ensuring that the assessment tool used to set individual budgets covers necessary services and resources to live in the least restrictive environmentnew text end . The commissioner must ensure, subject to state and federal regulations and law, that waiver reimagine does not result in unintended service disruptions. new text begin The commissioner must ensure that individual budgets are set based on the needs of the individual and not tied to location of services, including additional resources beyond the resources required to meet assessed need that may be necessary for the individual to live in the least restrictive environment.new text end Sec. 3. new text begin DIRECTION TO COMMISSIONER OF HUMAN SERVICES; INPUT ON WAIVER REIMAGINE PLAN.new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding Laws 2021, First Special Session chapter 7, article 13, section 75, as amended by Laws 2024, chapter 108, article 1, section 28, and this act, prior to seeking federal approval for a Waiver Reimagine plan or implementation of the same, the commissioner of human services must first submit the Waiver Reimagine plan to the Legislative Task Force on Waiver Reimagine, to the legislature, and to all waiver service recipients in a specific communication directly to the recipients in a format the recipient can retrieve, allowing at least six months for review and input and for the commissioner to make any changes to the plan as a result of the input. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner of human services shall not submit the Waiver Reimagine plan for federal approval without first receiving approval from the Legislative Task Force on Waiver Reimagine. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin LEGISLATIVE TASK FORCE ON WAIVER REIMAGINE.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Membership. new text end new text begin (a) The Legislative Advisory Task Force on Waiver Reimagine consists of the following members: new text end new text begin (1) one member of the house of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives; new text end new text begin (2) one member of the house of representatives, appointed by the leader of the house of representatives Democratic-Farmer-Labor caucus; new text end new text begin (3) one member of the senate, appointed by the senate majority leader; new text end new text begin (4) one member of the senate, appointed by the senate minority leader; new text end new text begin (5) four individuals presently receiving waiver benefits who are under the age of 65, appointed by the Legislative Coordinating Commission. When making the appointments under this clause, the Legislative Coordinating Commission must strive to appoint at least one individual from greater Minnesota and at least one individual assessed to receive ten or more hours of waiver services per day; new text end new text begin (6) one county employee who conducts long-term care consultation services assessments for persons under the age of 65, appointed by the Minnesota Association of County Social Services Administrators; new text end new text begin (7) one employee of an organization that operates on behalf of a county as a contracted case manager to individuals under age 65 receiving waiver services, appointed by the Legislative Coordinating Commission; new text end new text begin (8) one representative of the Department of Human Services with knowledge of the requirements for a provider to participate in waiver service programs and of the administration of benefits, appointed by the commissioner of human services; new text end new text begin (9) one employee of the Minnesota Council on Disability, appointed by the Minnesota Council on Disability; new text end new text begin (10) one member each from two different disability advocacy organizations, appointed by the Legislative Coordinating Commission. When making the appointment under this clause, the Legislative Coordinating Commission must strive to appoint a member from a self-advocate organization; new text end new text begin (11) two family members of individuals under the age of 18 who are receiving waivered services, appointed by the Legislative Coordinating Commission. When making the appointments under this clause, the Legislative Coordinating Commission must strive to appoint at least one member from greater Minnesota; new text end new text begin (12) two family members of individuals aged 18 or older and under age 65 who are receiving waivered services, appointed by the Legislative Coordinating Commission. When making the appointments under this clause, the Legislative Coordinating Commission must strive to appoint at least one member from greater Minnesota; new text end new text begin (13) two providers of waivered services for persons who are under the age of 65, appointed by the Legislative Coordinating Commission. When making the appointments under this clause, the Legislative Coordinating Commission must strive to appoint at least one member from greater Minnesota; new text end new text begin (14) one member appointed by the Minnesota Indian Affairs Council; new text end new text begin (15) one member of the Council on Developmental Disabilities, appointed by the executive director of the council; new text end new text begin (16) one employee from the Office of Ombudsman for Mental Health and Developmental Disabilities, appointed by the ombudsman; new text end new text begin (17) one employee from the Office of Ombudsman for Long Term Care, appointed by the ombudsman; new text end new text begin (18) one employee from the Olmstead Implementation Office, appointed by the director of the office; new text end new text begin (19) one member of a behavioral health advocacy organization that advocates on behalf of recipients of waiver services, appointed by the Legislative Coordinating Commission; new text end new text begin (20) one provider of behavioral health services to recipients of waiver services, appointed by the Legislative Coordinating Commission; new text end new text begin (21) one member from the Home Care Association, appointed by the Legislative Coordinating Commission; new text end new text begin (22) an employee of the Department of Human Services that is a leader of the Advisory Committee on Waiver Reimagine, appointed by the commissioner of human services; new text end new text begin (23) a member representing the interests of individuals from the Black, Indigenous, and People of Color community who are under the age of 65 and receiving waiver services, appointed by the Legislative Coordinating Commission; new text end new text begin (24) the assistant commissioner of aging and disability services; new text end new text begin (25) two current public members of the Advisory Committee on Waiver Reimagine, appointed by the Legislative Coordinating Commission; and new text end new text begin (26) a member of the Minnesota Disability Law Center, appointed by the executive director of Mid-Minnesota Legal Aid. new text end new text begin (b) Each appointing authority must make its appointments by September 30, 2025. Appointments made by an agency or commissioner may also be made by a designee. The chair of the Legislative Coordinating Commission shall make all appointments on behalf of the Legislative Coordinating Commission. new text end new text begin (c) The Legislative Coordinating Commission will serve as convener of the task force. The task force must elect a chair and other officers it deems necessary from among the legislative members of the task force. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Meetings; administrative support. new text end new text begin The first meeting of the task force must be convened no later than November 30, 2025. The task force must meet at least quarterly. Meetings are subject to Minnesota Statutes, chapter 13D. The task force may meet by telephone or interactive technology consistent with Minnesota Statutes, section 13D.015. The Legislative Coordinating Commission shall provide meeting space and administrative and research support to the task force. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Duties. new text end new text begin (a) The task force must make findings and recommendations related to Waiver Reimagine in Minnesota, including but not limited to the following: new text end new text begin (1) consolidation of the existing four disability home and community-based waiver service programs into two waiver programs; new text end new text begin (2) budgets based on the needs of the individual that are not tied to location of services, including additional resources beyond the resources required to meet assessed needs that may be necessary for the individual to live in the least restrictive environment; new text end new text begin (3) individual budget methodologies, including methodologies that account for multiple budget setting factors such as assessed need; history of authorized budgets; history of budget utilization limited by unavailability of services, staff, and other factors; history of hospitalizations; proximity of services; and availability of services, including transportation; new text end new text begin (4) criteria and process for provider rate exceptions and individualized budget exceptions; new text end new text begin (5) appropriate assessments, including the MnCHOICES 2.0 assessment tool, in determining service needs and individualized budgets; new text end new text begin (6) covered services under each waiver program, including any proposed adjustments to the menu of services; new text end new text begin (7) application process waiver services; new text end new text begin (8) service planning and authorization process for waiver services; new text end new text begin (9) process of a provider applying for and offering waivered services; new text end new text begin (10) plan of support, financial and otherwise, to live in the person's own home and in the most integrated setting as defined under Title 2 of the Americans with Disability Act (ADA) Integration Mandate and in Minnesota's Olmstead Plan; new text end new text begin (11) program structure not based on where an individual receiving waivered services lives, but rather the support needs of the individual regardless of location; new text end new text begin (12) intended and unintended consequences of Waiver Reimagine; and new text end new text begin (13) other items related to Waiver Reimagine as necessary. new text end new text begin (b) The task force must seek input from the public, counties, persons receiving waivered services, families of persons receiving waivered services, providers, state agencies, advocacy groups, and attorneys. The task force must hold public meetings to gather information to fulfill the purpose of the task force. The meetings must be accessible by remote participants. The Department of Human Services shall provide relevant data and research to the task force to facilitate their work. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Compensation; expenses. new text end new text begin Members of the task force may receive compensation and expense reimbursement as provided in Minnesota Statutes, section 15.059, subdivision 3. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Report; expiration. new text end new text begin The task force shall submit a report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over waiver services no later than January 15, 2027. The report required by the Waiver Reimagine Advisory Committee in subdivision 4 of Laws 2021, First Special Session chapter 7, article 13, section 75, as amended by Laws 2024, chapter 108, article 1, section 28, and this act, must be presented to the Legislative Task Force prior to December 15, 2026. The task force report required under this subdivision must describe any concerns or recommendations related to Waiver Reimagine as identified by the task force. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Expiration. new text end new text begin The task force expires upon submission of its report, or December 31, 2027, whichever is earlier. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end